Tennessee, session 114, HB2096.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-1-225(f), is amended by deleting
"By February 1, 2026, and by each February 1 thereafter" and substituting "By February 1,
2026, and by each February 15 thereafter".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2096
012269
- 1 -